src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-4lex_cahalig_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čáhálig: # MLO, ok
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Nom: čáhálig
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Gen: čáhálig
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Acc: čáhálig
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Ill: čáháligán
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Loc: čáháliggeest
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Com: čáháliggáin
    čáhálig+N+Sg+Abe: čáháligttáá
    čáhálig+N+Ess: čáháliggen
    čáhálig+N+Par: čáháligged
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Nom: čáháligeh
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Gen: čáháligij
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Acc: čáháligijd
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Ill: čáháligáid
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Loc: čáháligijn
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Com: [čáháligijguin, čáháligijgijn]
    čáhálig+N+Pl+Abe: čáháligijttáá
    
  Noun - tažâlig: # MLO, ok
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Nom: tažâlig
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Gen: tažâlig
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Acc: tažâlig
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Ill: tažâligán
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Loc: tažâliggeest
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Com: tažâliggáin
    tažâlig+N+Sg+Abe: tažâligttáá
    tažâlig+N+Ess: tažâliggen
    tažâlig+N+Par: tažâligged
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Nom: tažâligeh
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Gen: tažâligij
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Acc: tažâligijd
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Ill: tažâligáid
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Loc: tažâligijn
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Com: [tažâligijguin, tažâligijgijn]
    tažâlig+N+Pl+Abe: tažâligijttáá
    
    
